DI-1134
DIAGNOSTICS - MULTIPLEX COMMUNICATION SYSTEM

DIAX6-01

DTC B1272 | Power seat ECU communication stop

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

This DTC is output when communication stops between the Power seat ECU (driver seat ECU) and the Body
ECU.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

No communication from driver seat ECU for more than 10 * Power seat ECU (Driver seat ECU)

B1272 seconds. *Wire harness

WIRING DIAGRAM
See page DI-1118.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check power seat ECU.

CHECK:

Check that the operation of front vertical and rear vertical is normal.

HINT:

With this inspection, whether or not the power seat ECU CPU functions normally can be diagnosed.

NG> Replace power seat ECU (See page IN-38).
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2 [ Check wire harness. (See page IN-38)

PREPARATION:
Pull out the ECU connectors mentioned below.
Wire harness side connector of ECU Terminal
Power seat ECU - Body ECU MPX1 (S32-4) - MPX2 (B12-23)
Power seat ECU - Remote control mirror ECU MPX1 (S32-9) - MPX1 (R47-25)

CHECK:
Check continuity of the wire harness between the connectors.
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There is a continuity between the connectors.
HINT:
If there is OPEN in any wire harness, please repair it.

NG> Repair or replace wire harness.

Replace power seat ECU (See page IN-38).
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